Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 147.1, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . g. A statewide nonprofit organization that is an organ procurement organization, as âorgan procurement organizationâ is defined in section 142C.2. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 806, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor